Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. In General
§ 1-22-114.
Effect of adoption.

Upon the entry of a final decree of adoption the former parent, guardian or putative father of the child shall have no right to the control or custody of the child. The adopting persons shall have all of the rights and obligations respecting the child as if they were natural parents.

Adopted persons may assume the surname of the adoptive parent. They are entitled to the same rights of person and property as children and heirs at law of the persons who adopted them.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 2, §§ 4, 10; R.S. 1887, §§ 2277, 2286; R.S. 1899, §§ 3018, 3027; C.S. 1910, §§ 3955, 3964; C.S. 1920, §§ 5021, 5029; R.S. 1931, §§ 20-207, 20-215; C.S. 1945, §§ 58-204, 58-216; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-712, 1-721, 1-726.14; Laws 1977, ch. 187, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to change of name in adoption proceedings, see §

1-25-104

.

As to rights of heirs at law, see title 2.

Statutory provisions control. —

Adoption at common law was unknown and, therefore, the adoption of minor children as well as the rights and liabilities emanating therefrom are governed by statutory provisions concerning descent, distribution and adoption. In re Estate of Randall, 506 P.2d 432,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1973).

Natural grandparent not entitled to visit child. —

Any agreement, whether it was oral or in writing or whether or not it was included within the terms of an adoption decree, would not give a natural grandparent a right to visitation with the child. To the extent the existence of any such agreement permitting her to visit with the child could be proved, it would be void and unenforceable as violative of public policy. In re Adoption of RDS, 787 P.2d 968,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1990).

Because the legislature did not provide that paternal grandparent visitation rights survived the adoption of their grandchild by the child's maternal grandparents, such visitation rights were limited and terminable without notice, and therefore did not rise to the magnitude of constitutionally protected liberty interests. The adoption statutes extinguished all legal relationships between the adopted child and his biological family. Hede v. Gilstrap, 2005 WY 24, 107 P.3d 158,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2005).

Heirship. —

A son by adoption became the legal heir of the intestate brother of his adopted father, who died before the intestate brother. In re Cadwell's Estate, 26 Wyo. 412, 186 P. 499,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1920).

Where two brothers were adopted by one family and several siblings were not, and where one of the brothers died intestate without any children, a district court erred in determining that the biological siblings were entitled to an inheritance; the other adopted brother's daughter was the only true heir of the decedent. Shippey v. Rogers (In re Estate of Kirkpatrick), 2003 WY 125, 77 P.3d 404,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2003).

Rights of inheritance prior to 1969 amendment. —

See In re Estate of Randall, 506 P.2d 432,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1973).

Rights of inheritance vest immediately on the death of intestate

and devolutionary rights must be determined in relation to that date. In re Estate of Randall, 506 P.2d 432,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1973).

Applied

in

Lucas v. Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1948).

Quoted

in

In re TR, 777 P.2d 1106,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Nugent v. Powell, 4 Wyo. 173, 33 P. 23,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 9

, 20 L.R.A. 199 (1893); Lucas v. Strauser, 65 Wyo. 98, 196 P.2d 862,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1948); E.R.C.K. v. State Dep't of Family Servs., 2013 WY 160, 314 P.3d 1170,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 166

, 2013 WL 6822656 (Dec 24, 2013); E.R.C.K. v. State Dep't of Family Servs., 2013 WY 160, 314 P.3d 1170,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 166

, 2013 WL 6822656 (Dec 24, 2013).

Law reviews. —

See “Administrative Problems Relating to Adoption,” 8 Wyo. L.J. 210.

See “Implied Revocation of Wills in Wyoming,” 10 Wyo. L.J. 112.

See article “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

For case notes, “Constitutional Law—Family Law—Grandparent Visitation
Rights—Constitutional Considerations and the Need to Define the ‘Best Interest of the Child’ Standard. Goff v. Goff, 844 P.2d 1087,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1993),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Adoption as affecting right of inheritance through or from natural parent or other natural kin, 37 ALR2d 333.

Right of adopted child to inherit from kindred of adoptive parent, 43 ALR2d 1183.

Change of child's name in adoption proceedings, 53 ALR2d 927.

Conflict of laws as to adoption as affecting descent and distribution of decedent's estate, 87 ALR2d 1240.

Right of children of adopted child to inherit from adopting parent, 94 ALR2d 1200.

Right of adopted child to inherit from intestate natural grandparent, 60 ALR3d 631.

Validity and application of statute authorizing change in record of birthplace of adopted child, 14 ALR4th 739.

Natural parent's parental rights as affected by consent to child's adoption by other natural parent, 37 ALR4th 724.

Adopted child as subject to protection of statute regarding rights of children pretermitted by will, or statute preventing disinheritance of child, 43 ALR4th 947.

Adoption as precluding testamentary gift under natural relative's will, 71 ALR4th 374.

Postadoption visitation by natural parent, 78 ALR4th 218.

Adopted child as within class named in testamentary gift, 36 ALR5th 395.

Adopted child as within class named in deed or inter vivos trust instrument, 37 ALR5th 237.

Grandparents' visitation rights where child's parents are deceased, or where status of parents is unspecified, 69 ALR5th 1.

Grandparents' visitation rights where child's parents are living, 71 ALR5th 99.

Denial of social security benefits to adopted children who are
neither natural children nor stepchildren of eligible individual and
who do not meet dependency requirements, under § 202(d)(8) of the
Social Security Act, as amended (42 USC § 402(d)(8)),
57 ALR Fed 124.

§ 1-22-115.
Subsidization of adoption; qualification for payments; authority
to adopt rules and regulations.

The department of family services may grant subsidy payments to the adoptive parent of a child or to another person on behalf of the child, if, at the time the child is placed for adoption:

The child is in the legal custody of the department or a private child placement agency certified by the state and is legally available for adoption;

The department or a certified private child placement agency is financially responsible for the child;

Reasonable efforts to place the child for adoption prior to consideration of a subsidy payment have been unsuccessful;

The child has special needs as determined by the division; and

The department or a certified private child placement agency has determined the adoptive parent can provide for the nonfinancial needs of the child.

Subsidy payments under this section may provide for the cost of health, maintenance, medical and surgical treatment and costs incurred for the adoption, care, training and education of the child.

The determination of an adoptive parent’s eligibility for subsidy payments shall be made before the completion of the legal adoption of the child. All payments shall be reviewed not less than annually by the department. Subsidy payments may continue, subject to rules and regulations of the department, for any adoptive parent terminating Wyoming residency with the child in custody.

The department of family services shall adopt a plan pursuant to P.L. 96-272 and rules and regulations necessary for the administration of this section.

Subsidy payments made under this section shall:

Not exceed the amount of payments for comparable assistance under foster care;

Be terminated or reduced if the need for payments has altered or no longer exists as determined by the department or if the child has reached the age of majority; and

Be made from funds appropriated to the department for foster care purposes.

The department of family services may accept on behalf of the state any available federal funds for purposes consistent with this section. The department shall administer the funds in conformance with this section and the terms and conditions under which they are issued.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 144, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Editor's notes. —

Public Law 96-272, referred to in subsection (d), appears as various sections throughout 26 and 42 U.S.C.

§ 1-22-116.
Medical history of natural parents and adoptive child.

To the extent available,
the medical history of a child subject to adoption and his natural
parents, with information identifying the natural parents eliminated,
shall be provided by an authorized agency or may be provided by order
of a court to the child’s adoptive parent any time after the adoption
decree or to the child after he attains the age of majority. The history
shall include but not be limited to all available information regarding
conditions or diseases believed to be hereditary, any drugs or medication
taken during pregnancy by the child’s natural mother and any other
information which may be a factor influencing the child’s present
or future health. The department of family services shall promulgate
rules governing the release of medical histories under this section.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 144, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Meaning of “agency.” —

The term “agency,” as used in the first sentence, apparently means “agency” as defined in § 1-22-101(a)(i). See also § 1-22-101(a)(v).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

“Wrongful adoption” causes of action against adoption agencies where children have or develop mental or physical problems that are misrepresented or not disclosed to adoptive parents, 74 ALR5th 1.

§ 1-22-117.
Putative father registry.

The department of family services shall establish a putative father registry which shall record the names and addresses of:

Any person adjudicated by a court of this state to be the father of a child born out-of-wedlock;

Any person who has filed with the registry before or after the birth of a child out-of-wedlock, a notice of intent to claim paternity of the child;

Any person adjudicated by a court of another state or territory of the United States to be the father of an out-of-wedlock child, where a certified copy of the court order has been filed with the registry by that person or any other person; and

Any person who has filed with the registry an instrument acknowledging paternity.

A person filing a notice of intent to claim paternity of a child or an acknowledgement of paternity shall include therein his current address and shall notify the registry of any change of address pursuant to procedures prescribed by regulations of the department.

A person who has filed a notice of intent to claim paternity may at any time revoke a notice of intent to claim paternity previously filed therewith and, upon receipt of the notification by the registry, the revoked notice of intent to claim paternity shall be deemed a nullity nunc pro tunc.

An unrevoked notice of intent to claim paternity of a child may be introduced in evidence by any party, other than the person who filed such notice, in any proceeding in which such fact may be relevant.

The department of family services shall, upon request, provide the names and addresses of persons listed with the registry to any court or authorized agency, and such information shall not be divulged to any other person, except upon order of a court for good cause shown.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 170, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of putative father to visitation with child born out of wedlock, 58 ALR5th 669.